Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6054.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Beverage" means a soft drink, soda water, carbonated natural or mineral water, or other nonalcoholic carbonated drink; beer, ale, or other malt drink of whatever alcoholic content; or a mixed wine drink or a mixed spirit drink. (b) "Beverage container" means an airtight metal, glass, paper, or plastic container, or a container composed of a combination of these materials , which, at the time of sale, that contains 1 gallon or less of a beverage at the time of sale. (c) "Empty returnable container" means a beverage container which that contains nothing except the residue of its the original contents of the beverage container. (d) "Returnable container" means a beverage container upon for which a deposit of at least not less than 10 cents has been paid, or is required to be paid upon on the removal of the beverage container from the sale or consumption area, and for which a refund of at least not less than 10 cents in cash is payable by every dealer or distributor in this state of that beverage in beverage containers , as further provided in under section 2. (e) "Nonreturnable container" means a beverage container upon for which no deposit or a deposit of less than 10 cents has been paid, or is required to be paid upon on the removal of the beverage container from the sale or consumption area, or for which no cash refund or a refund of less than 10 cents is payable by a dealer or distributor in this state of that beverage in beverage containers , as further provided in under section 2. (f) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity. (g) "Dealer" means a person who that sells or offers for sale to consumers within this state a beverage in a beverage container, including an operator of a vending machine containing a beverage in a beverage container. (h) "Operator of a vending machine" means equally its the owner of the vending machine, the person who that refills it, the vending machine, and the owner or lessee of the property upon which it where the vending machine is located. (i) "Distributor" means a person who that sells beverages in beverage containers to a dealer within this state, and includes a manufacturer who that engages in such those sales. (j) "Manufacturer" means a person who that bottles, cans, or otherwise places beverages in beverage containers for sale to distributors, dealers, or consumers. (k) "Within this state" means within the exterior limits of the this state, of Michigan, and includes the territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America. (l) "Commission" means the Michigan liquor control commission created in section 209 of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1209. (m) "Sale or consumption area" means the premises within on the property of the dealer or of the dealer's lessor where the sale is made, within which where beverages in returnable containers may be consumed without payment of a deposit, and , upon removing a beverage container from which, the customer is required by where a consumer may not remove a beverage container without the dealer requiring the consumer to pay the a deposit. (n) "Nonrefillable container" means a returnable container which that is not intended to be refilled for sale by a manufacturer. (o) "Mixed wine drink" means a drink or similar product marketed as a wine cooler and containing that contains less than 7% alcohol by volume, consisting consists of wine and plain, sparkling, or carbonated water, and containing any contains 1 or more of the following: (i) Nonalcoholic beverages. (ii) Flavoring. (iii) Coloring materials. (iv) Fruit juices. (v) Fruit adjuncts. (vi) Sugar. (vii) Carbon dioxide. (viii) Preservatives. (p) "Mixed spirit drink" means a drink containing that contains 10% or less alcohol by volume consisting of distilled spirits mixed with nonalcoholic beverages or flavoring or coloring materials and which may also contain water, fruit juices, fruit adjuncts, sugar, carbon dioxide, or preservatives; or any spirits based beverage, regardless of the percent of alcohol by volume, that is manufactured for sale in a metal container. (q) "Reverse vending machine" means a device designed to properly identify and process empty beverage containers and provide a means for a deposit refund on returnable containers. Sec. 2a. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), beginning 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a manufacturer of nonalcoholic beverages shall not sell, offer for sale, or give a nonalcoholic beverage to a consumer, dealer, or distributor in this state in a 12-ounce metal beverage container that is not a designated metal container if either of the following is met: (a) Sales of that brand of beverage in 12-ounce metal beverage containers in this state in the preceding calendar year were at least 500,000 cases, as determined by the department of treasury. (b) Sales of that brand of beverage in 12-ounce metal beverage containers in this state in the preceding calendar year were fewer than 500,000 cases, and 12-ounce metal beverage containers of that brand of beverage were overredeemed by more than 600,000 containers in the preceding calendar year, as determined by the department of treasury. (2) Beginning 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a A manufacturer of nonalcoholic beverages shall not sell, offer for sale, or give a nonalcoholic beverage to a consumer, dealer, or distributor in the Upper Peninsula in a 12-ounce metal beverage container that is not a designated metal container if either of the following is met: (a) Sales of that brand of beverage in 12-ounce metal beverage containers in the Upper Peninsula were at least 500,000 cases, as determined by the department of treasury. (b) Sales of that brand of beverage in 12-ounce metal beverage containers in the Upper Peninsula in the preceding calendar year were fewer than 500,000 cases, and 12-ounce metal beverage containers of that brand of beverage were overredeemed in the Upper Peninsula by more than 600,000 containers in the preceding calendar year, as determined by the department of treasury. (3) Except as provided in subsection (4), beginning 450 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a manufacturer of nonalcoholic beverages shall not sell, offer for sale, or give a nonalcoholic beverage to a consumer, dealer, or distributor in this state in a 12-ounce glass beverage container that is not a designated glass container if either of the following is met: (a) Sales of that brand of beverage in 12-ounce glass beverage containers in this state in the preceding calendar year were at least 500,000 cases, as determined by the department of treasury. (b) Sales of that brand of beverage in 12-ounce glass beverage containers in this state in the preceding calendar year were fewer than 500,000 cases, and 12-ounce glass beverage containers of that brand of beverage were overredeemed by more than 600,000 containers in the preceding calendar year, as determined by the department of treasury. (4) Beginning 450 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a A manufacturer of nonalcoholic beverages shall not sell, offer for sale, or give a nonalcoholic beverage to a consumer, dealer, or distributor in the Upper Peninsula in a 12-ounce glass beverage container that is not a designated glass container if either of the following is met: (a) Sales of that brand of beverage in 12-ounce glass beverage containers in the Upper Peninsula were at least 500,000 cases, as determined by the department of treasury. (b) Sales of that brand of beverage in 12-ounce glass beverage containers in the Upper Peninsula in the preceding calendar year were fewer than 500,000 cases, and 12-ounce glass beverage containers of that brand of beverage were overredeemed in the Upper Peninsula by more than 600,000 containers in the preceding calendar year, as determined by the department of treasury. (5) Except as provided in subsection (6), beginning 450 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a manufacturer of nonalcoholic beverages shall not sell, offer for sale, or give a nonalcoholic beverage to a consumer, dealer, or distributor in this state in a 20-ounce plastic beverage container that is not a designated plastic container if either of the following is met: (a) Sales of that brand of beverage in 20-ounce plastic beverage containers in this state in the preceding calendar year were at least 500,000 cases, as determined by the department of treasury. (b) Sales of that brand of beverage in 20-ounce plastic beverage containers in this state in the preceding calendar year were fewer than 500,000 cases, and 20-ounce plastic beverage containers of that brand of beverage were overredeemed by more than 600,000 containers in the preceding calendar year, as determined by the department of treasury. (6) Beginning 450 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a A manufacturer of nonalcoholic beverages shall not sell, offer for sale, or give a nonalcoholic beverage to a consumer, dealer, or distributor in the Upper Peninsula in a 20-ounce plastic beverage container that is not a designated plastic container if either of the following is met: (a) Sales of that brand of beverage in 20-ounce plastic beverage containers in the Upper Peninsula were at least 500,000 cases, as determined by the department of treasury. (b) Sales of that brand of beverage in 20-ounce plastic beverage containers in the Upper Peninsula in the preceding calendar year were fewer than 500,000 cases, and 20-ounce plastic beverage containers of that brand of beverage were overredeemed in the Upper Peninsula by more than 600,000 containers in the preceding calendar year, as determined by the department of treasury. (7) Beginning 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a A manufacturer of alcoholic beverages shall not sell, offer for sale, or give an alcoholic beverage to a consumer, dealer, or distributor in this state in a 12-ounce metal beverage container that is not a designated metal container if either of the following is met: (a) Sales of that brand of beverage in this state in the preceding calendar year were at least 500,000 case equivalents, as determined by the department of treasury. (b) Sales of that brand of beverage in this state in the preceding calendar year were fewer than 500,000 case equivalents, and beverage containers of that brand of beverage were overredeemed by more than 600,000 containers in the preceding calendar year, as determined by the department of treasury. (8) Beginning 450 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a A manufacturer of alcoholic beverages shall not sell, offer for sale, or give an alcoholic beverage to a consumer, dealer, or distributor in this state in a 12-ounce glass beverage container that is not a designated glass container if either of the following is met: (a) Sales of that brand of beverage in this state in the preceding calendar year were at least 500,000 case equivalents, as determined by the department of treasury. (b) Sales of that brand of beverage in this state in the preceding calendar year were fewer than 500,000 case equivalents, and beverage containers of that brand of beverage were overredeemed by more than 600,000 containers in the preceding calendar year, as determined by the department of treasury. (9) Beginning 450 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a A manufacturer of alcoholic beverages shall not sell, offer for sale, or give an alcoholic beverage to a consumer, dealer, or distributor in this state in a 20-ounce plastic beverage container that is not a designated plastic container if either of the following is met: (a) Sales of that brand of beverage in this state in the preceding calendar year were at least 500,000 case equivalents, as determined by the department of treasury. (b) Sales of that brand of beverage in this state in the preceding calendar year were fewer than 500,000 case equivalents, and beverage containers of that brand of beverage were overredeemed by more than 600,000 containers in the preceding calendar year, as determined by the department of treasury. (10) A symbol, mark, or other distinguishing characteristic that is placed on a designated metal container, designated glass container, or designated plastic container by a manufacturer to allow a reverse vending machine to determine if that container is a returnable container must be unique to this state, or used only in this state and 1 or more other states that have laws substantially similar to this act. (11) A person that violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 180 days, or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. Section 4 does not apply to a violation described in this subsection. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Alcoholic beverage" means beer, ale, any other malt drink of whatever alcoholic content, a mixed wine drink, or a mixed spirit drink. (b) "Brand" means any word, name, group of letters, symbol, or trademark, or any combination of them, adopted and used by a manufacturer to identify a specific flavor or type of beverage and to distinguish that flavor or type of beverage from another beverage produced or marketed by that manufacturer or another manufacturer. (c) "Designated glass container" means a 12-ounce glass beverage container that contains a symbol, mark, or other distinguishing characteristic that allows a reverse vending machine to determine if the beverage container is or is not a returnable container. (d) "Designated metal container" means a 12-ounce metal beverage container that contains a symbol, mark, or other distinguishing characteristic that allows a reverse vending machine to determine if the beverage container is or is not a returnable container. (e) "Designated plastic container" means a 20-ounce plastic beverage container that contains a symbol, mark, or other distinguishing characteristic that allows a reverse vending machine to determine if the beverage container is or is not a returnable container. (f) "Glass beverage container" means a beverage container composed primarily of glass. (g) "Metal beverage container" means a beverage container composed primarily of metal. (h) "Nonalcoholic beverage" means a soft drink, soda water, carbonated natural or mineral water, or other nonalcoholic carbonated drink. (i) "Plastic beverage container" means a beverage container composed primarily of plastic. (j) "Reverse vending machine" means a device designed to properly identify and process empty beverage containers and provide a means for a deposit refund on returnable containers. Sec. 2b. (1) A dealer that provides a reverse vending machine as a method to redeem beverage containers shall provide counter redemption of beverage containers when the reverse vending machine is inoperable or does not accept a type of beverage container sold or offered for sale by the dealer. (2) If the department of attorney general receives a complaint of a violation of this section, the department shall investigate to determine if a violation of this section has occurred. (3) If the department of attorney general determines that a violation of this section has occurred, the department shall provide a dealer with a written notice of the violation and the opportunity to cure the violation. The written notice must inform the dealer that the dealer must cure the violation not later than 15 days after receipt of the notice. (4) Subject to subsection (5), if the dealer does not cure the noticed violation within 15 days after receiving the written notice under subsection (3), the dealer is subject to a civil fine of not more than $500.00 per violation. Each day a violation occurs, a separate offense is committed. (5) If a violation of this section continues for more than 60 consecutive days, a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 per day for each day that a violation continues after the initial 60-day period. Sec. 2c. (1) A dealer shall post, at the point of sale and within the area of redemption, a conspicuous sign that states the following: "CONSUMER BOTTLE BILL OF RIGHTS: State law requires us to redeem empty returnable beverage containers of the same kind, size, and brand that we sell or offer for sale. You have the right to get your deposit refund in cash, without proof of purchase; the right to return your empty returnable beverage containers any day and any hour, except for the first and last hour of the dealer's business day; and the right to return your containers if they are empty and intact. Washing containers is not required by law, but is strongly recommended to maintain sanitary conditions. To report a violation, call 877-765-8388 or contact the Michigan attorney general at www.michigan.gov/consumerprotection." (2) If the department of attorney general receives a report of a violation of this section, the department shall investigate to determine if a violation of this section has occurred. (3) The department of treasury, the commission, the department of attorney general, the department of state police, and local law enforcement may inspect a dealer as necessary to determine compliance with this section. (4) If an investigation under subsection (2) or an inspection under subsection (3) determines that a violation of this section has occurred, the department of attorney general shall provide a dealer with a written notice of the violation and the opportunity to cure the violation. The written notice must inform the dealer that the dealer must cure the violation not later than 15 days after receipt of the notice. (5) Subject to subsection (6), if the dealer does not cure the noticed violation within 15 days after receiving the written notice under subsection (4), the dealer is subject to a civil fine of not more than $500.00 per violation. Each day a violation occurs, a separate offense is committed. (6) If a violation of this section continues for more than 60 consecutive days, the dealer is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 per day for each day that a violation continues after the initial 60-day period. Sec. 4. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) and sections 2b, 2c, 4a, and 4b, a dealer, distributor, manufacturer, or other person that violates this act is subject to a civil fine of not less than $100.00 or more than $1,000.00 and is liable for the costs of prosecution. Each day a violation occurs, a separate offense is committed. (2) Subject to subsection (3), a distributor that, with the intent to defraud or cheat, violates section 4c is guilty of a crime punishable as follows: (a) If the filled beverage containers of the nonalcoholic beverages purchased in another state have a value of less than $200.00, the distributor is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both. imprisonment and a fine. (b) If either of the following applies, the distributor is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both: imprisonment and a fine: (i) The filled beverage containers of the nonalcoholic beverages purchased in another state have a value of $200.00 or more but less than $10,000.00. (ii) The distributor violates subdivision (a) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this subsection. (c) If either of the following applies, the distributor is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both: imprisonment and a fine: (i) The filled beverage containers of the nonalcoholic beverages purchased in another state have a value of $10,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00. (ii) The distributor violates subdivision (b)(i) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this subsection. For purposes of this subparagraph, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subdivision (a) or (b)(ii). (d) If either of the following applies, the distributor is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years, or a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both: imprisonment and a fine: (i) The filled beverage containers of the nonalcoholic beverages purchased in another state have a value of $20,000.00 or more but less than $50,000.00. (ii) The distributor violates subdivision (c)(i) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subparagraph, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subdivision (a) or (b)(ii). (e) If either of the following applies, the distributor is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years, or a fine of not more than $25,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both: imprisonment and a fine: (i) The filled beverage containers of the nonalcoholic beverages purchased in another state have a value of $50,000.00 or more but less than $100,000.00. (ii) The distributor violates subdivision (d)(i) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subparagraph, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subdivision (a) or (b)(ii). (f) If either of the following applies, the distributor is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years, or a fine of not more than $35,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both: imprisonment and a fine: (i) The filled beverage containers of the nonalcoholic beverages purchased in another state have a value of $100,000.00 or more. (ii) The distributor violates subdivision (e)(i) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subparagraph, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subdivision (a) or (b)(ii). (3) All of the following apply for purposes of subsection (2): (a) The values of filled beverage containers of the nonalcoholic beverages purchased in another state in separate incidents pursuant to in accordance with a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated to determine the total value involved in the violation of subsection (2). (b) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon on the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions must be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (i) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (ii) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (iii) Information contained in a presentence report. (iv) The defendant's statement. (c) If the sentence for a conviction under subsection (2) is enhanced by 1 or more prior convictions, those prior convictions must not be used to further enhance the sentence for the conviction under section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12.